Maryland, session 2026, SB0353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
7–105.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0353*

SENATE BILL 353
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Owner–occupied residential property” means residential property in
which at least one unit is occupied by an individual who:
(i) Has an ownership interest in the property; and
(ii) Uses the property as the individual’s primary residence.
(12) “Residential property” means real property improved by four or fewer
single family dwelling units that are designed principally and are intended for human
habitation.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an action to
foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust on residential property may not be filed until the later
of:
(i) 90 days after a default in a condition on which the mortgage or
deed of trust provides that a sale may be made; or
(ii) 45 days after the notice of intent to foreclose required under
subsection (c) of this section is sent.
(2) (i) The secured party may petition the circuit court for leave to
immediately commence an action to foreclose the mortgage or deed of trust if:
1. The loan secured by the mortgage or deed of trust was
obtained by fraud or deception;
2. No payments have ever been made on the loan secured by
the mortgage or deed of trust;
3. The property subject to the mortgage or deed of trust has
been destroyed;
4. The default occurred after the stay has been lifted in a
bankruptcy proceeding; or
5. The property subject to the mortgage or deed of trust is
property that is vacant and abandoned as provided under § 7–105.18 of this subtitle.
(ii) The court may rule on the petition with or without a hearing.
(iii) If the petition is granted:

SENATE BILL 353 3
1. The action may be filed at any time after a default in a
condition on which the mortgage or deed of trust provides that a sale may be made; and
2. The secured party need not send the written notice of
intent to foreclose required under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) An order to docket or a complaint to foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust on
residential property shall:
(1) Include:
(i) If applicable, the license number of:
1. The mortgage originator; and
2. The mortgage lender; and
(ii) An affidavit stating:
1. The date on which the default occurred and the nature of
the default; and
2. If applicable, that:
A. A notice of intent to foreclose was sent to the mortgagor or
grantor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section and the date on which the notice
was sent; and
B. At the time the notice of intent to foreclose was sent, the
contents of the notice of intent to foreclose were accurate; [and]
(2) Be accompanied by:
(i) The original or a certified copy of the mortgage or deed of trust;
(ii) A statement of the debt remaining due and payable supported by
an affidavit of the plaintiff or the secured party or the agent or attorney of the plaintiff or
secured party;
(iii) A copy of the debt instrument accompanied by an affidavit
certifying ownership of the debt instrument;
(iv) If applicable, the original or a certified copy of the assignment of
the mortgage for purposes of foreclosure or the deed of appointment of a substitute trustee;
(v) If any defendant is an individual, an affidavit that is in
compliance with § 521 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. App. § 501 et seq.;

SENATE BILL 353
(vi) If applicable, a copy of the notice of intent to foreclose;
(vii) If the secured party and mortgagor or grantor have elected to
participate in prefile mediation, the report of the prefile mediation issued by the Office of
Administrative Hearings;
(viii) If the secured party and the mortgagor or grantor have not
elected to participate in prefile mediation, a statement that the parties have not elected to
participate in prefile mediation;
(ix) In addition to any other filing fees required by law, a filing fee in
the amount of $450; and
(x) 1. If the loss mitigation analysis has been completed subject
to subsection (g) of this section, a final loss mitigation affidavit in the form prescribed by
regulation adopted by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation; and
2. If the loss mitigation analysis has not been completed, a
preliminary loss mitigation affidavit in the form prescribed by regulation adopted by the
Commissioner of Financial Regulation; AND
(3) BE COMMENCED NOT LATER THAN 10 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF
DEFAULT CLAIMED IN THE ORDER TO DOCKET OR COMPLAINT TO FORECLOSE.
(E–1) IF A FORECLOSURE IS COMMENCED BY A SECURED PARTY THAT
ACQUIRED DEBT THAT WAS IN DEFAULT FOR 5 OR MORE YEARS BEFORE THE
ACQUISITION, THE SECURED PARTY SHALL PRESENT THE DOCUMENTS REQUIRED
UNDER § 5–1203(B) OF THE COURTS ARTICLE WITH THE ORDER TO DOCKET OR
COMPLAINT TO FORECLOSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.